Washington statutes.
RCW 39.56.040

Cancellation of municipal warrants.

Registered or interest bearing warrants of any municipal corporation not presented within one year of the date of their call, or other warrants not presented within one year of their issue, shall be canceled by passage of a resolution of the governing body of the municipal corporation, and upon notice of the passage of such resolution the auditor of the municipal corporation and the treasurer of the municipal corporation shall transfer all records of such warrants so as to leave the funds as if such warrants had never been drawn.

[ 1975 1st ex.s. c 131 s 1.]